Hawaii statutes.
§91-15 Appeals. Review of any final
judgment of the circuit court or, if applicable, the environmental court, under
this chapter shall be governed by chapter 602. [L 1961, c 103, §15; Supp,
§6C-15; HRS §91-15; am L 1979, c 111, §10; am L 2014, c 218, §5]

Case Notes

Defendants argued they lacked fair notice of illegal conduct
because code book was never adopted pursuant to these sections. 824 F.2d 780.

An administrative agency is "an aggrieved party"
from a judgment which overturns a decision of the agency with respect to
implementation of legislation. 60 H. 436, 591 P.2d 113.

Standard used by appellate court when reviewing circuit
court's review of agency decision. 4 H. App. 633, 675 P.2d 784.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next